apertium-sme-smj.smj.lexc
! Lexicon for the deviating -im, -it suffixes
! Non-deviating form pointed to common PxCc
LEXICON PxCi
 +PxSg1:im K ;
 +PxSg2:it K ;
 PxCc ;

! Lexicon for regular PxC nom,acc, gen
LEXICON PxC
 +PxSg1:am K ;
 +PxSg1:im K ;
 +PxSg2:at K ;
 +PxSg2:it K ;
 PxCc ;

! Lexicon for regular PxC ine, ela, com and pl
LEXICON PxCs
 +PxSg1:ám K ;
 +PxSg2:át K ;
 +PxSg3:es K ;
 +PxDu1:ema K ;
 +PxDu2:eda K ;
 +PxDu3:eska K ;
 +PxPl1:ema K ;
 +PxPl2:eda K ;
 +PxPl3:esa K ;


!Commom lexicon for all PxC
LEXICON PxCc
 +PxSg3:is K ;
 +PxDu1:imme K ;
 +PxDu2:ihtte K ;
 +PxDu3:iska K ;
 +PxPl1:imme K ;
 +PxPl2:ihtte K ;
 +PxPl3:isá K ;



LEXICON K
 ENDLEX ;
! +Clt:clitic ENDLEX ;
 +Foc/ge:#ge ENDLEX ;
 +Foc/gen+Use/Circ:#gen ENDLEX ; !
 +Foc/ga+Use/Circ:#ga ENDLEX ;	!
! +Clt+k:#k ENDLEX ;


LEXICON ENDLEX
 @D.NeedNoun.ON@ # ;
! This ENDLEX business in order to remove illegal compounds.

! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no


! ========================================================================== !
!                     Lule Sámi verb lexicon                                 !
! ========================================================================== !





LEXICON LEXATTR  ! This lexicon is here to give the tags to the compounding
 +A+Attr:%> ATTR ; ! attributive forms.

LEXICON At !NB Have commented out everything except K ; here to avoid strange compounds like -šlailágán etc. Attr. that can be compounded with NAMAT etc are redirected to LEXATTR
+A+Attr:%> K ;
!+A+Attr: NAMÁK ;
!+A+Attr: R ;                    

LEXICON VINJO- 
+A+Attr: NAMÁK ; 
+A+Attr:%> R ; 

LEXICON NAMÁK
+Der1+Der/nálán:#»nálán AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/madák:#»madág9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/maduk:#»madug9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/juolgak:#»juolgag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/luottak:#»luottag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/lágásj:#»lágátj LÁGÁSJ ;
+Der1+Der/lágán:#»lágán LÁGÁSJ ;
+Der1+Der/suttak:#»suttag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/uvsuk:#»uvsug9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/jienak:#»jienag9 AGAdj "voiced A" ;
+Der1+Der/rattak:#»rattag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/hekkak:#»hekkag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/åjvak:#»åjvag9 AGAdj "headed A" ;
+Der1+Der/belak:#»belag9 AGAdj "sided A" ;
+Der1+Der/sijduk:#»sijdug9 AGAdj "sided A" ;
+Der1+Der/giedak:#»giedag9 AGAdj "handed A" ;
+Der1+Der/gielak:#»gielag9 AGAdj "-ish A" ;
+Der1+Der/muoduk:#»muodug9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/tjiluk:#»tjilug9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/varák:#»varág9 AGAdj "blooded A" ;
+Der1+Der/báguk:#»bágug9 AGAdj "worded A" ;
+Der1+Der/nálak:#»nálag9 AGAdj "lineaged A" ;
+Der1+Der/rabdak:#»rabdag9 AGAdj "edged A" ;
+Der1+Der/rávak:#»rávag9 AGAdj "edged A" ;
+Der1+Der/ájvuk:#»ájvug9 AGAdj "edged A" ;
+Der1+Der/gárvok:#»gárvog9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/gárvuk:#»gárvug9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/såjak:#»såjag9 AGAdj "winged A" ;
+Der1+Der/giesjkak:#»giesjkag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/bának:#»bánag9 AGAdj "toothed A" ;
+Der1+Der/njálmak:#»njálmag9 AGAdj "mouthed A" ;
+Der1+Der/nierak:#»nierag9 AGAdj "cheeked A" ;
+Der1+Der/merkak:#»merkag9 AGAdj "marked A" ;
+Der1+Der/suorgak:#»suorgag9 AGAdj "forked A" ;
+Der1+Der/suorak:#»suorag9 AGAdj "forked A" ;
+Der1+Der/gattsak:#»gattsag9 AGAdj "nailed A" ;
+Der1+Der/sejbak:#»sejbag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/sejnak:#»sejnag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/hájak:#»hájag9 AGAdj "smelled A" ;
+Der1+Der/habsak:#»habsag9 AGAdj "smelled A" ;
+Der1+Der/hápsak:#»hápsag9 AGAdj "smelled A" ;
+Der1+Der/hábjak:#»hábjag9 AGAdj "smelled A" ;
+Der1+Der/sáv0vak:#»sáv'vag9 AGAdj "seamed A" ;
+Der1+Der/namák:#»namág9 AGAdj "named A" ;
+Der1+Der/lanják:#»lanjág9 AGAdj "roomed A" ;
+Der1+Der/vuoduk:#»vuodug9 AGAdj "bottomed A" ;
+Der1+Der/hámak:#»hámag9 AGAdj "formed A" ;
+Der1+Der/linnjak:#»linnjag9 AGAdj "lined A" ;
+Der1+Der/lijkak:#»lijkag9 AGAdj "skinned A" ;
+Der1+Der/dávtak:#»dávtag9 AGAdj "bed A" ;
+Der1+Der/tjårvak:#»tjårvag9 AGAdj "horned A" ;
+Der1+Der/getjak:#»getjag9 AGAdj "tipped A" ;
+Der1+Der/beljak:#»beljag9 AGAdj "eared A" ;
+Der1+Der/tjuvdak:#»tjuvdag9 AGAdj "fingered A" ;
+Der1+Der/dábak:#»dábag9 AGAdj "mannered A" ;
+Der1+Der/tjiegak:#»tjiegag9 AGAdj "cornered A" ;
+Der1+Der/gerdak:#»gerdag9 AGAdj "layered A" ;
+Der1+Der/vuobdak:#»vuobdag9 AGAdj "haired A" ;
+Der1+Der/uvsak:#»uvsag9 AGAdj "doored A" ;
+Der1+Der/ivnak:#»ivnag9 AGAdj "coloured A" ;
+Der1+Der/ferjak:#»ferjag9 AGAdj "coloured A" ;
+Der1+Der/bájnuk:#»bájnug9 AGAdj "coloured A" ;
+Der1+Der/luonduk:#»luondug9 AGAdj "natured A" ;
+Der1+Der/dávdak:#»dávdag9 AGAdj "diseased A" ;
+Der1+Der/jergak:#»jergag9 AGAdj "sensed A" ;
+Der1+Der/mielak:#»mielag9 AGAdj "sensed A" ;
+Der1+Der/jiermak:#»jiermag9 AGAdj "sensed A" ;
+Der1+Der/njunjak:#»njunjag9 AGAdj "nosed A" ;
+Der1+Der/guovluk:#»guovlug9 AGAdj "orientated A" ;
+Der1+Der/dáfuk:#»dáfug9 AGAdj "faceted A" ;
+Der1+Der/vájmuk:#»vájmug9 AGAdj "hearted A" ;
+Der1+Der/lahkak:#»lahkag9 AGAdj "parted A" ;
+Der1+Der/åsak:#»åsag9 AGAdj "parted A" ;
+Der1+Der/garák:#»garág9 AGAdj "crusted A" ;
+Der1+Der/tjuolmak:#»tjuolmag9 AGAdj "knotted A" ;
+Der1+Der/tjålak:#»tjålag9 AGAdj "gutted A" ;
+Der1+Der/segak:#»segag9 AGAdj "mixed A" ;
+Der1+Der/tjalmak:#»tjalmag9 AGAdj "eyed A" ;
+Der1+Der/juvlak:#»juvlag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/vigák:#»vigág9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/girjak:#»girjag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/stával:#»stávval STÁVAL ;
+Der1+Der/agák:#»agág9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/jagák:#»jagág9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/bájnok:#»bájnog9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/muoduk:#»muodug9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/sjattuk:#»sjattug9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/tjuodak:#»tjuodag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/láhkásasj:#»láhkásadtj Ahkásasj ;
+Der1+Der/sláj:#»sláj At ;


LEXICON SASJ !XXXFROM NUMERALS
+Der1+Der/ahkásasj:#»ahkásadtj Ahkásasj ;
+Der1+Der/biejvvásasj:#»biejvvásadtj Ahkásasj ;
+Der1+Der/ájggásasj:#»ájggásadtj Ahkásasj ;
+Der1+Der/jahkásasj:#»jahkásadtj Ahkásasj ;
+Der1+Der/gærddásasj:#»gærddásadtj Ahkásasj ;
+Der1+Der/tjuohtásasj:#»tjuohtásadtj Ahkásasj ;
+Der1+Der/gielalasj:#»gielaladtj Ahkásasj ;
+Der1+Der/klássak:#»klássag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/tijmmasasj:#»tijmmasadtj AGAdj ;

!LEXICON NAMMASAS  !FROM NAMES
!+Der/nammasasj:#»nammasadtj Ahkásasj ;
!Not used.

LEXICON ACCRA-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani:%> ACCRADECL ;

LEXICON ACCRA-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> ACCRADECL ; 

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> ACCRADECL-LOAN ; 

LEXICON ACCRA-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> ACCRADECL ; 

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> ACCRADECL-LOAN ; 

LEXICON ACCRA-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%>  ACCRADECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 
LEXICON ACCRA-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%>  ACCRADECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON ACCRA-femsur
 +N+Prop+Fem:%>  ACCRADECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Sur:%>  ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 
LEXICON ACCRA-malfem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%>  ACCRADECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Mal:%>  ACCRADECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON ACCRA-objplc
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;
 
LEXICON ACCRA-femplc
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;
 
LEXICON ACCRA-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 
LEXICON ACCRA-malsur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 +N+Prop+Mal:%>  ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

 

LEXICON NounRoot
nubbe#giella+N+Sg+Ill:nuppe#giella%>j K ;
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
 bahá:bahá LEXATTR ;  !Irregular attr. form
boahtte At ;
dálásj LEXATTR ;
duolbbat:duolbba LEXATTR ;
ienemus LEXATTR ;
jasska LEXATTR ;
njuoras:njuorris LEXATTR ;
 sáme#giel At ; ! check this! XXX gæhttjaladdat sámegiel bágoj 
 sáme#giel At ; ! check this! XXX gæhttjaladdat sámegiel bágoj 
siegge:sekka LEXATTR ;
snávggat:snávgges LEXATTR ; 
tjáres:tjárris LEXATTR ; 
unne:unnes LEXATTR ; 
LEXICON ProperNoun
Kato:Kato9 ACCRA-mal ;
Mahlakaarto:Mahlakaarto9 ACCRA-sur ;
Mengo:Mengo9 ACCRA-org ;
Si^ao:Si^ao9 ACCRA-mal ;
Suivakko:Suivakko9 ACCRA-ani ;
Valio:Valio9 ACCRA-malsur ;
Yahoo:Yahoo9 ACCRA-org ;
Woche ACCRA-sur ;
All^helgon^kyrka ACCRA-obj ;
 Sami% Culture% in% a% New% Era+Use/Sub:Sami% Culture% in% a% New% Era ACCRA-LOAN-obj; !
 The% Norwegian% Sami% Experience+CmpN/None:The% Norwegian% Sami% Experience ACCRA-LOAN-obj; !
Jeger^stua ACCRA-obj ;
Columbia ACCRA-objplc ;
Soria% Moria ACCRA-objplc ;
Soria-Moria ACCRA-objplc ;
Salla ACCRA-femplc ;
Nord^landia ACCRA-org ;
Statistiska ACCRA-org ;
Enova ACCRA-org ;
Tele ACCRA-org ;
Samisk% videregå^ende% skole+CmpN/None:Samisk% videregå^ende% skole ACCRA-LOAN-org ;
Doajmmasiebrre% Julevsábme:Doajmmasiebrre% Julevsábme ACCRA-LOAN-org ;
Tjalve ACCRA-org ;
Univirsity ACCRA-org ;
Luonto^poika ACCRA-ani ;
Pikku^musta ACCRA-ani ;
Giste ACCRA-ani ;
Rulla^huuli ACCRA-ani ;
Mumi ACCRA-ani ;
Jokeri ACCRA-ani ;
Čebu ACCRA-ani ;
Dáiv-Isá ACCRA-ani ;
Grandiosa  ACCRA-obj ;
Amiga ACCRA-obj ;
Vi^agra ACCRA-obj ;
Open^Office ACCRA-obj ;
Narukami ACCRA-obj ;
Samisk% høg^skole+CmpN/None:Samisk% høg^skole ACCRA-LOAN-org ;
Ilia ACCRA-mal ;
Ridge ACCRA-mal ;
Jon-Arne ACCRA-mal ;
Iskkon-Máhte ACCRA-mal ;
Tommi ACCRA-mal ;
Ailu ACCRA-mal ;
Jovná ACCRA-mal ;
Kabria ACCRA-fem ;
Josefa ACCRA-fem ;
Merika ACCRA-fem ;
Svetlana ACCRA-fem ;
Lyyra ACCRA-fem ;
Wenche ACCRA-fem ;
Moline ACCRA-fem ;
Marte ACCRA-fem ;
Suvi ACCRA-fem ;
Inge ACCRA-malfem ;
Janne ACCRA-malfem ;
Kari ACCRA-malfem ;
Talikka ACCRA-sur ;
Nevala ACCRA-sur ;
Pesola ACCRA-sur ;
Tuomi^ranta ACCRA-sur ;
Røhne ACCRA-sur ;
Øver^li ACCRA-sur ;
Finn^mark% fylkes^kommune+CmpN/None:Finn^mark% fylkes^kommune ACCRA-LOAN-org ;
Uoti ACCRA-sur ;
Ilkka ACCRA-malsur ;
Sara ACCRA-femsur ;
Eira ACCRA-femsur ;
Aase ACCRA-femsur ;
Turi ACCRA-femsur ;
 Krisjna ACCRA-obj ; !Or mal?
 Ui^O+Use/Sub:Ui^O ACCRA-org; !
Vivaro	  ACCRA-obj ;
LEXICON Adverb
vuolen+Adv:vuolen%> PxC ;
LEXICON Demonstrative
duola+Pron+Dem:duola%> K ;
LEXICON Indefinite
 vajku% mij+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:vajku% ma%>jt K ; ! speller diehti
 vájk% guhti+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:vájk% gut%> K ; ! speller diehti
 iesj#guhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:iesj#guhti%>k NAMÁK ; ! 
 ietjá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:iehtjád%>a NAMÁK ; ! 
ietjá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela:iehtjád%>is K ;
 ietjá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:iehtjád%>ij NAMÁK ; ! 
iesj+Pron+Refl+Com+PxSg3:ietja%>nisá%>jn K ;
juohkka+Pron+Indef:juohkka%> NAMÁK ;
 soames+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:soames%> NAMÁK ; ! 
goabbák+Pron+Indef:goabbá%>k NAMÁK ;
fært+Pron+Indef:fært%> NAMÁK ;
færtta+Pron+Indef:færtta%> NAMÁK ;
 ednak+Pron+Indef+Attr+Use/NG:edna%> NAMÁK ; ! 
ietjes+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen:iehtjás%>a NAMÁK ;
juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:juobbá%> K ;
LEXICON Adposition
duogen+Po:duoge%>n PxC ;
duoges+Po:duoge%>st PxC ;
duohkáj+Po:duohká%>s PxC ;
maŋŋáj+Po:maŋŋá%>s PxC ;
åvdån+Po:åvdå%>n PxC ;
åvdås+Po:åvdå%>st PxC ;
maŋen+Po:maŋe%>n PxC ;
LEXICON LÅGENAN					
lågenan#nubbe+A+Ord+Sg+Ill:lågenan#nubbá%>j K ;     
gávtses#lågenan+N+Coll+Sg+Nom:gávtses#lågenan%> K ;      
lågenan#gålmås+N+Coll+Sg+Nom:lågenan#gålmås%> K ;      
LEXICON num-imprecise
bielle#nup#+A+Ord+Sg+Attr:bielle#nup%># SASJ ;								
biel#goalmát+A+Ord+Attr:biel#goalmád9%> SASJ ;        
biel#vidát+A+Ord+Attr:biel#vidád9%> SASJ ;        
biel#giehttjit+A+Ord+Attr:biel#giehttjid9%> SASJ ;         
biel#avtsát+A+Ord+Attr:biel#avtsád9%> SASJ ;        
bielle#goalmát+A+Ord+Attr:bielle#goalmád9%> SASJ ;        
bielle#vidát+A+Ord+Attr:bielle#vidád9%> SASJ ;        
bielle#giehttjit+A+Ord+Attr:bielle#giehttjid9%> SASJ ;         
bielle#avtsát+A+Ord+Attr:bielle#avtsád9%> SASJ ;        
